District of Columbia statutes.
38-1205.11

Mayoral stipends.

The Mayor shall make available tuition stipends for students of the School of Law who are bona fide residents of the District of Columbia and who agree to employment by the District of Columbia government, or by any public service organization or institution designated by the Mayor, for a period of time immediately following the students’ graduation from the School of Law. The length of service required shall be established by the terms of the stipends. Any stipend recipient who fails to perform the post-graduation work requirement shall be held liable to the District of Columbia for 3 times the amount of stipend funds provided to the recipient.

Oct. 26, 1974, Pub. L. 93-471, title V, § 511
as added Feb. 24, 1987, D.C. Law 6-177, § 2(a), 33 DCR 7241
1981 Ed., § 31-1551.